Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 42

Labor of County and City Prisoners

12-42-101. Definition.

As used in §§12-42-109,12-42-110,12-42-112,12-42-113, and12-42-115, “county inmates” means persons convicted of misdemeanors or petty offenses and committed to jail in default of the payment of the fine and costs adjudged against them.

History.

Acts 1877, No. 73, § 14, p. 73; C. & M. Dig., § 2059; Pope's Dig., § 2661; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-519; 2013, No. 295, § 7.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “‘county inmates’” for “‘county convicts’”.

12-42-102. Penalties.

A person who uses the work of a prisoner or enters into a contract to lease and use the work of a prisoner convicted of a misdemeanor in violation of §§12-42-104 —12-42-107 upon conviction is guilty of an unclassified misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and may be imprisoned not exceeding ninety (90) days.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 118, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-512; Acts 2017, No. 845, § 5.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted the (a) and (b) designations; and rewrote the section to clarify the language.

12-42-103. County farm — Purchase authorized.

Plenary power is conferred upon the county levying court at its regular or specially called meeting, to authorize the county court or the county judge thereof in vacation to purchase in the name and for the benefit of the county, a tract of land not to exceed two thousand (2,000) acres, or the levying court shall have the power, if it deem best, to direct the court or the county judge thereof in vacation, to lease in the name and for the benefit of the county, a farm upon which the county prisoners shall be worked under the provisions of this section or §§12-42-108,12-42-114,12-42-115,16-90-405, and16-96-504 [repealed].

History.

Acts 1881, No. 81, § 11, p. 148; 1893, No. 120, § 4, p. 207; 1899, No. 111, § 1, p. 179; C. & M. Dig., § 2081; Pope's Dig., § 2683; Acts 1961, No. 254, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-520.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 16-96-504 was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 558.

12-42-104. Leasing procedure exclusive.

It shall be unlawful for any county judge or mayor of any city or incorporated town or any person to lease or contract for the lease of any prisoner convicted of a misdemeanor, whether a violation of the laws of the state or ordinance of any municipality, except as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 118, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-501.

12-42-105. Workhouses and public works.

Any person who may be convicted of a misdemeanor or petty offense by any court in this state and who shall be committed to jail to serve a sentence imposed by any court of competent jurisdiction or who shall be in default of the payment of the fine and costs adjudged against him or her may be required to discharge the sentence or fine and costs by manual labor in any workhouse, farm, street, road, bridge, or other public work in the county where the conviction and committal occurred.

However, the workhouse, farm, road, street, bridge, or other public work shall be owned, operated, or conducted by the State of Arkansas, any county thereof, or a city or incorporated town within the State of Arkansas.

Cited: Howerton v. Mississippi County, 361 F. Supp. 356 (E.D. Ark. 1973).

Any county, city, or town contracting for the safekeeping of inmates under the provisions of this section and §§ 12-42-102, 12-42-104, 12-42-105, and 12-42-107, shall obligate itself to furnish the inmates with good and wholesome food, comfortable clothing, and medicine when sick and shall not require them to work at unreasonable hours or for a longer time during any one (1) day than other laborers doing the same kind of labor are accustomed to do.

A county sheriff, constable, mayor, or other officer to whom a person is committed for imprisonment to serve a sentence imposed for a misdemeanor or petty offense or in default of the payment of fine and costs therefor shall not be responsible for the health, safety, or welfare of the person if the county sheriff, constable, mayor, or other officer shall deliver the person to any county, city, or town other than that of which the former is an officer, pursuant to a contract for the maintenance, safekeeping, and working of inmates authorized by statute.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “inmates” for “prisoners” throughout the section; substituted “inmates” for “convicts” in (c); and, in (d), substituted “A” for “No” at the beginning and inserted “not” preceding “be responsible”.

The practice of contracting the work of inmates of penal institutions of other counties on public projects in a county is not equivalent to working of inmates to pay fines and costs and, therefore, does not violate equal protection secured by U.S. Const., Amend. 14. Howerton v. Mississippi County, 361 F. Supp. 356 (E.D. Ark. 1973).

The superintendant may be at any time removed by the county court or county judge, and another may be appointed by the county judge in vacation, subject to approval at the next term of the county court.

This section is directory and not mandatory and therefore not in conflict with Ark. Const., Art. 7, § 28. State ex rel. Richardson v. Mack, 191 Ark. 350, 86 S.W.2d 11 (1935).

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “inmates” for “convicts” in the section heading, and twice in (a).

History.

Acts 1939, No. 118, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-502.

12-42-106. Contracts with other counties, cities, or towns — Liability.

(1)The county court or the county judge thereof in vacation, or the mayor of any city or incorporated town, when authorized to do so by an ordinance duly adopted by the city or town council or other governing body of the municipality, is authorized and empowered to make a contract with any other county, city, or town for the maintenance, safekeeping, and working of inmates committed to county or city jails except inmates awaiting trial.

The county court, county judge, or mayor may make such contract as deemed in the best interests of the county, city, or incorporated town.

For the purpose of making a contract to effectuate the provisions of this section and §§12-42-102,12-42-104,12-42-105, and12-42-107, the county court or county judge of any county, and the mayor, with the approval of the city or town council, or other governing body of any municipality, is vested with plenary power.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 118, §§ 3, 6; 1965, No. 371, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-504, 46-511, 46-511.1; 2013, No. 295, § 8.

12-42-107. Procedure when satisfactory contract cannot be made.

(1)If the county court or county judge thereof in vacation, or the mayor of any city or incorporated town, is unable to make a satisfactory contract with some county, city, or incorporated town, or if the contract does not necessarily, by its terms, cover all persons committed to jail to serve a sentence or in default of the payment of a fine and costs adjudged against him or her, in the county or city where the conviction is had, then the county court or county judge thereof may order the prisoners to be worked.

The prisoners may be worked on the public roads, bridges, levees, or any other public improvement of the county or may perform any other lawful labor for the benefit of the county.

The city or town council or the governing body of any municipality or the mayor thereof may order the prisoners worked on any public streets, alleys, public buildings, public parks, or any other public improvements of the city or may order them to perform any other lawful labor for the benefit of the city, under such rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this section or §§12-42-102 and12-42-104 —12-42-106, as the county court or county judge thereof, or the mayor and governing body of any municipality thereof may prescribe.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 118, § 4; 1965, No. 371, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-505.

12-42-108. Superintendent.

In the event that the county court or county judge thereof shall order the prisoners to be worked on roads, bridges, levees, or other county improvements, it shall be the duty of the county court or county judge thereof to appoint some suitable person as superintendent to take charge of, manage, and control the labor of the prisoners, who shall, for the purpose of working them, be authorized to employ such guards or adopt such means to prevent escapes as may be necessary.

The superintendant shall have all the power of punishing for refusal to work given to contractors in this subchapter.

Upon the order of the county judge, the county sheriff shall deliver to the superintendent all prisoners in his or her custody and receive them back from him or her whenever he or she shall return them for any purpose to the jail.

The superintendent shall take an oath to faithfully discharge his or her duties and shall receive such compensation for his or her services as the court may fix.

History.

Acts 1881, No. 81, § 12, p. 148; 1899, No. 111, § 2, p. 179; C. & M. Dig., §§ 2082, 2086; Pope's Dig., §§ 2684, 2688; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-506, 46-507.

12-42-109. Management of inmates not hired.

Unless the inmates are immediately hired out, the management and control of the county inmates shall be confined to county courts either in term time or in vacation by the county judge.

The county court or county judge shall always have the right to require the aid of the county sheriff and constables of their respective counties. All lawful orders or process necessary to be issued and executed shall be executed by the county sheriff or constable.

History.

Acts 1877, No. 73, § 12, p. 73; C. & M. Dig., § 2057; Pope's Dig., § 2659; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-517; 2013, No. 295, § 9.

12-42-110. Labor on public works restricted.

A county inmate shall not be allowed to work on any public work or improvement whenever there may be danger of his or her escape, nor shall he or she be compelled to labor at any kind of business or in any avocation that would tend to impair his or her health or strength.

History.

Acts 1877, No. 73, § 10, p. 73; C. & M. Dig., § 2055; Pope's Dig., § 2657; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-516; 2013, No. 295, § 10.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “A county inmate shall not be” for “No county convict shall be”.

12-42-111. Credit for labor.

Every county court or a county official designated by the county court may utilize persons convicted and committed to the county jails to perform manual labor in any workhouse, farm, road, street, bridge, or other public work owned, operated, or conducted by the state or any county, city, or incorporated town within the state.

An inmate performing such labor shall receive compensatory time in the amount of one (1) additional day's credit against his or her sentence for each day's labor.

The county court shall determine what constitutes a day's labor.

Furthermore, the county court or a county official designated by the county court shall determine which inmates may participate in this program and the extent of their participation.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 27, § 1; 1985, No. 931, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-502.1.

12-42-112. Compensation of artisan or mechanic.

If any person so convicted is an artisan or mechanic and is put to labor in any manual labor workhouse, or on any bridge or other public improvement, the artisan or mechanic shall be allowed a reasonable compensation for the labor, but the compensation shall not be paid to the artisan or mechanic.

History.

Acts 1877, No. 73, § 2, p. 73; C. & M. Dig., § 2047; Pope's Dig., § 2648; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-503.

12-42-113. Warrants for costs.

When inmates employed on public works or improvements or in public workhouses shall have paid the full amount of their fines and costs by their labor, then the county court shall issue a warrant in favor of each officer to whom costs may be due, for the amount of his or her costs, on the county treasurer, and it shall be paid if there are sufficient funds in the county treasury.

History.

Acts 1877, No. 73, § 9, p. 73; C. & M. Dig., § 2054; Pope's Dig., § 2656; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-515; 2013, No. 295, § 11.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “inmates” for “convicts”.

12-42-114. Arrest of escapees.

If any prisoner shall escape from the contractor or superintendent, the contractor or superintendent shall have the right to arrest the prisoner, in person or through any county sheriff or constable, anywhere in the state.

The prisoner, when arrested, shall be delivered to the contractor or county sheriff of the county, and shall be compelled to work out all costs in making his or her arrest, in the manner provided in this section and §§ 12-42-103, 12-42-108, 12-42-115, 16-90-405, and 16-96-504 [repealed].

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 16-96-504 was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 558.

A descriptive list of all persons known as county inmates;

How the inmate has been or is employed;

The name of the party or parties hiring the inmate;

The time when and the price at which the inmate has been employed;

The amount paid or allowed for the employed or hired inmate;

The amount due by the inmate as fine and costs; and

Such other information as may be necessary and required under the rules adopted by the court.

Publisher's Notes. This section, insofar as it relates to the hiring of convicts by private contractors, may be affected by §12-42-104.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “inmates” for “convicts” in the section heading; and substituted “inmate” for “convict” and “inmates” for “convicts” throughout the section.

The chief executive officer may allow inmates as described in subsection (b) of this section to participate in work-release programs in accordance with rules, regulations, and procedures adopted by the chief executive officer.

Under any work-release program, earnings by the inmate shall be paid directly to the chief executive officer and applied as follows:

The chief executive officer shall retain an amount to be established by the legislative body which will reasonably compensate the chief executive officer for the cost of feeding and housing the inmate;

The chief executive officer shall determine if the inmate has persons depending upon him or her for their support and may remit to such persons that portion of the earnings which the chief executive officer considers reasonable; and

The chief executive officer shall determine if the inmate has created victims of his or her criminal conduct who are entitled to restitution or reparations for physical injury or loss of or damage to property and may remit to such victims that portion of the earnings which the chief executive officer considers reasonable.

However, in no case shall the portion of earnings remitted for restitution be in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of the inmate's income remaining after deductions for the cost of care and custody and family support in subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section.

The names and addresses of the victims and the amount of restitution to be paid shall be provided to the chief executive officer by certificate of the trial court in which the defendant was convicted.

Cited: Brewer v. State, 274 Ark. 38, 621 S.W.2d 698 (1981).

Any of the prisoners in the county jails located in counties having a population of between twenty-four thousand five hundred (24,500) and twenty-five thousand five hundred (25,500) and between forty-seven thousand five hundred (47,500) and forty-seven thousand six hundred (47,600) inhabitants may be permitted to voluntarily work in any cemetery or on any other public project in those counties.

The prisoners shall be allowed a credit on any fine owed of five dollars ($5.00) for each day they perform such voluntary labor.

History.

Acts 1881, No. 81, § 14, p. 148; C. & M. Dig., § 2088; Pope's Dig., § 2690; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-513.

12-42-115. Records of inmates.

The county court shall cause a record of all its proceedings under §§12-42-101,12-42-109,12-42-110,12-42-112,12-42-113, and this section to be recorded in a well-bound book to be provided for that purpose. The record shall contain:

It shall be the duty of the contractor or superintendent to keep a record in which shall be stated the name of the prisoner, his or her height, race, age, complexion, color of eyes and hair, time of commitment, and the punishment adjudged by the court or justice, as well as the number of days the inmate may be held to labor and a record of the days worked by the prisoner.

History.

Acts 1877, No. 73, § 13, p. 73; 1881, No. 81, § 15, p. 148; 1883, No. 78, § 4, p. 125; C. & M. Dig., §§ 2058, 2090; Pope's Dig., §§ 2660, 2692; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-514; 46-518; 2013, No. 295, § 12.

12-42-116. Work-study release — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Chief executive officer” means the county sheriff of the county if the criminal detention facility is owned or operated by a county of this state or the chief of police if the criminal detention facility is owned or operated by a municipality of this state;

“Legislative body” means the quorum court of the county in which the county-owned or operated criminal detention facility is located, or if the criminal detention facility is owned or operated by a municipality, it means whatever body is authorized to adopt ordinances for that jurisdiction; and

“Work-release” means programs under which inmates selected to participate in such programs may be gainfully employed or attend schools outside of a jail.

Any person who may be convicted by any court in this state and who is committed to a jail to serve a sentence imposed by any court of competent jurisdiction or in default of the payment of the fine and costs adjudged against him or her may be released for the purpose of participation in work-release programs under the conditions and procedures contained in subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 413, §§ 1-3; 1985, No. 1046, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-421 — 46-423.

12-42-117. Voluntary labor.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 89, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-521.

12-42-118. Appropriations.

At its annual or specially called meeting for making appropriations, the county court shall make the necessary appropriations to carry out the purposes of this section and §§12-42-103,12-42-108,12-42-114,12-42-115,16-90-405, and16-96-504 [repealed].

History.

Acts 1899, No. 111, § 4, p. 179; C. & M. Dig., § 2084; Pope's Dig., § 2686; Acts 1961, No. 254, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-509.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section 16-96-504 was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 558.

Chapters 43-47

[Reserved.]

[Reserved.]